Arkansas statutes. Constitution Of The State Of Arkansas Of 1874
AMEND. 10.
LIMITATION ON LEGISLATIVE AND TAXING POWER (CONST., ART. 12, § 4, AMENDED).

Publisher's Notes.

This amendment amended Ark. Const., Art. 12, § 4, and is incorporated therein. The amendment was proposed by the General Assembly at the 1923 regular session (see Acts 1923, p. 797) and voted upon at the general election on October 7, 1924. Returns: for, 57,854; against, 35,449. The amendment was declared adopted in Brickhouse v. Hill, 167 Ark. 513, 268 S.W. 865 (1925).

Effective Dates.

Ark. Const. Amend. 10, § 2: effective 60 days after adoption.